Utah statutes.
20A-6-305.   Master ballot position list -- Random selection -- Procedures -- Publication -- Surname -- Exemptions.

(1)  As used in this section, "master ballot position list" means an official list of the 26 characters in the alphabet listed in random order and numbered from one to 26 as provided under Subsection (2).

(2)  The lieutenant governor shall:

(a)  at the beginning of each general election year conduct a random selection to establish the master ballot position list for the current year and the next year in accordance with procedures established under Subsection (2)(c);

(b)  publish the master ballot position lists on the lieutenant governor's election website on or before February 1 in each regular general election year; and

(c)  establish written procedures for:

(i)  the election official to use the master ballot position list; and

(ii)  the lieutenant governor in:

(A)  conducting the random selection in a fair manner; and

(B)  providing a record of the random selection process used.

(3)  In accordance with the written procedures established under Subsection (2)(c)(i), an election officer shall use the master ballot position list for the current year to determine the order in which to list candidates on the ballot for an election held during the year.

(4)  To determine the order in which to list candidates on the ballot required under Subsection (3), the election officer shall apply the randomized alphabet using:

(a)  the candidate's surname;

(b)  for candidates with a surname that has the same spelling, the candidate's given name;

(c)  the surname of the president and the surname of the governor for an election for the offices of president and vice president and governor and lieutenant governor; and

(d)  if the ballot provides for a ticket or a straight party ticket, the registered political party name.

(5)  This section does not apply to:

(a)  an election for an office for which only one candidate is listed on the ballot; or

(b)  a judicial retention election under Section 20A-12-201.



Enacted by Chapter 292, 2011 General Session

